Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Distribution and Sales
§ 63-17-76.
Application for used motor vehicle dealer’s license to be accompanied by documentation of completion of education seminar; conduct of seminars; approval of seminars by State Tax Commission.

Every application for the issuance of a used motor vehicle dealer’s license shall be accompanied by such evidence as the State Tax Commission shall prescribe, documenting the completion of an education seminar conducted by the Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of application. Completion of an eight-hour licensing seminar conducted by the Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association shall be required for an initial license. All seminars must be approved by the State Tax Commission. The education requirements of this section shall not apply to:

Used motor vehicle dealer the primary business of which is the sale of salvage vehicles on behalf of insurers;

A manufactured home dealer; or

A franchised new car dealer licensed under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law or any employee of such a dealer.

The Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association shall submit to the State Tax Commission a complete and specific description of the seminars it conducts pursuant to this section, a description of how the seminar will benefit licensees in conducting their businesses, the number of hours involved, a description of the method which will be used to ensure attendance, and copies of any instructional materials which will be provided to attendees. At the time approval is granted, the State Tax Commission shall determine how many hours of education may be received by attending the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 63-17-77.
License fees; expiration dates.

All applications for license or licenses shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee or fees therefor in accordance with the schedule thereof hereinafter set out. In the event any application is denied and the license applied for is not issued, the entire license fee shall be returned to the applicant.

The schedule of license fees to be charged and received by the commission for the licenses issued shall be as follows:

For each manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory branch and division or distributor branch and division, and wholesaler branch and division, four hundred dollars ($400.00).

For each motor vehicle dealer, factory representative, distributor representative and wholesaler representative, one hundred dollars ($100.00).

For each motor vehicle salesman, ten dollars ($10.00).

Any person, firm or corporation required to be licensed, who fails to make application for such license at the time required, shall, in addition to the aforesaid fees, pay interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum for the period of time during which he shall operate without a proper license, and in addition thereto, shall pay a penalty of fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the license fee. Said penalty, however, may be waived in whole or in part within the discretion of the commission.

All licenses shall expire on the thirty-first day of December following the date of issue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-05; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 326; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-79.
Specification of location of business; effect of change of location.

The license issued to each motor vehicle dealer, manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory branch or division, distributor branch or division, or wholesaler branch or division, shall specify the location of the factory, office, branch or division thereof. In case such location is changed, the commission shall endorse the change of location on the license without charge if it be within the same county. A change of location to another county shall require a new license.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-05; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 15; Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-80.
Motor vehicle lessors required to be licensed.

It is unlawful for a motor vehicle lessor or any agent, employee or representative thereof: (a) to represent and to offer for lease any new motor vehicle in Mississippi without first obtaining a new motor vehicle dealer license, or (b) to lease or offer to lease a new motor vehicle from an unlicensed location.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-17-81.
License of salesman.

Every motor vehicle salesman shall have his license upon his person, or displayed at his place of employment, except as hereinafter provided, when engaged in his business, and shall display the same upon request. The name and business address of the employer of such salesman shall be stated on the license.

In case of a change of employer the following procedure shall be adhered to:

The licensee shall within three (3) days following such change mail or deliver his license to the commission for its endorsement of such change thereon. The license shall be accompanied by a fee of Two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($2.50) for endorsing each such change of employer and a written statement of the licensee setting forth the name and business address of his new employer, the date his employment terminated with his last employer, and the date his employment commenced with his new employer.

The last employer of the licensee shall, within three (3) days following the termination of employment of the licensee, make a report to the commission setting forth the reason or reasons why the services of the licensee were terminated and such other information as may be required by the commission.

Upon receipt by the commission of the licensee’s license and fee and his last employer’s report, the commission shall immediately make an appropriate endorsement on said license showing the change of employer and mail the license, as endorsed, to the licensee unless the commission has grounds to believe and does believe that the licensee is no longer qualified under the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law as a motor vehicle salesman. Under such circumstances the commission shall immediately notify him and his new employer in writing that a hearing will be held for the purpose of determining whether his license should be revoked or suspended, specifying the grounds for revocation or suspension, as the case may be, and the time and place for the hearing. Such hearing and any and all appeals by the licensee with respect thereto shall be in accordance with the provisions of Sections 63-17-89 through 63-17-99.

If, after the commission receives the licensee’s license and fee and his last employer’s report, the executive director of the commission cannot for any reason endorse and mail to the licensee his license within a period of three (3) days following the receipt by the commission of the licensee’s license and fee and his last employer’s report, then and in that event he shall mail to the licensee a permit in such form as the commission shall prescribe, which permit shall serve in lieu of a license until such time as the commission endorses and mails the license to the licensee or until such time as the licensee’s license is revoked or suspended in accordance with the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law. If the license is ultimately revoked or suspended then immediately upon such revocation or suspension the licensee shall return said permit to the commission for cancellation.

The commission shall maintain a permanent file with respect to each licensed motor vehicle salesman. Each such file shall contain all pertinent information with respect to the fitness and qualifications of each such licensee for the use by the commission in from time to time determining whether his license should be revoked or suspended.

There is no intent under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law to prevent a salesman who has not previously been licensed or a transferee salesman from selling during the time required to process his application. Such applicant shall be allowed to sell from the date of employment as long as he and his dealer follow the procedure for license application.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-05; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 16; Laws, 1994, ch. 399, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 63-17-83.
License of factory representative or distributor representative.

Every motor vehicle factory representative or distributor representative shall have his license upon his person when engaged in his business, and shall display the same upon request. The name of the employer of such factory representative or distributor representative shall be stated on said license. In case of a change of employer, the holder of such license shall immediately mail same to the commission for its endorsement of such change thereon. A fee of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be charged by the commission for endorsing each such change of employer on said licenses, and said fee shall accompany the application for change.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-05; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-85.
Grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension of license; assessment of civil penalty in lieu of suspension of license; collection and disposition of penalty.

The commission may deny an application for a license, or revoke or suspend a license after it has been granted, for any of the following reasons:

On satisfactory proof of unfitness of the applicant or the licensee, as the case may be, under the standards established and set out in the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law.

For fraud practiced or any material misstatement made by an applicant in any application for license under the provisions of Section 63-17-75.

For any willful failure to comply with any provision of said law or with any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission under authority vested in it by said law.

Change of condition after license is granted or failure to maintain the qualifications for license.

Continued or flagrant violation of any of the provisions of said law or of any of the rules or regulations of the commission.

For any willful violation of any law relating to the sale, distribution or financing of motor vehicles.

Willfully defrauding any retail buyer to the buyer’s damage.

Willful failure to perform any written agreement with any retail buyer.

Being a manufacturer who, for the protection of the buying public, fails to specify the delivery and preparation obligations of its motor vehicle dealers prior to delivery of new motor vehicles to retail buyers. A copy of the delivery and preparation obligations of its motor vehicle dealers and a schedule of the compensation to be paid to its motor vehicle dealers for the work and services they shall be required to perform in connection with such delivery and preparation obligations shall be filed with the commission by every licensed motor vehicle manufacturer and shall constitute any such dealer’s only responsibility for product liability as between such dealer and such manufacturer. The compensation as set forth on said schedule shall be reasonable and the reasonableness thereof shall be subject to the approval of the commission. Any mechanical, body or parts defects arising from any express or implied warranties of any such manufacturer shall constitute such manufacturer’s product or warranty liability.

On satisfactory proof that any manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch or division, factory branch or division, or wholesaler branch or division has unfairly and without due regard to the equities of the parties or to the detriment of the public welfare failed to properly fulfill any warranty agreement or to adequately and fairly compensate any of its motor vehicle dealers for labor, parts and/or incidental expenses incurred by any such dealer with regard to factory warranty agreements performed by any such dealer. In no event shall any such manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch or division, factory branch or division, or wholesaler branch or division pay to any of its motor vehicle dealers a labor rate per hour for warranty work less than that charged by any such dealer to its retail customers. No such dealer shall charge to its manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, distributor branch or division, factory branch or division, or wholesaler branch or division, a labor rate per hour in excess of the rate charged to its retail customers. All claims made by motor vehicle dealers hereunder for such labor, parts and/or incidental expenses shall be paid within thirty (30) days following their approval. All such claims shall be either approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days after their receipt, and when any such claim is disapproved the motor vehicle dealer who submits it shall be notified in writing of its disapproval within said period, and each such notice shall state the specific grounds upon which the disapproval is based.

For the commission of any act prohibited by Sections 63-17-73 through 63-17-83 or the failure to perform any of the requirements of said sections.

If the commission finds, after notice and hearing in the manner provided for under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law, that there is sufficient cause upon which to base the revocation of the license of any licensee involved in the hearing, the commission may in lieu of revoking such license assess a civil penalty against the guilty licensee not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). If the commission finds, after such notice and hearing, that sufficient cause exists for the suspension only of the license of any licensee, the commission may in lieu of suspending such license assess a civil penalty against the guilty licensee of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day for each day such license would otherwise be suspended. However, the amount of such penalty shall not exceed an aggregate of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500.00). Failure of the licensee to pay all penalties so assessed within the time allowed by the commission for the payment thereof, which time shall in no case exceed ninety (90) days from the date of the commission’s order making such assessment, shall, unless an appeal is taken and perfected within the time and in the manner provided by the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law, result in an automatic revocation of such licensee’s license. Any such penalties assessed by the commission remaining unpaid at the expiration of the time for payment may be recovered by an action in the name of the commission. All such actions shall be brought by the attorney general of the State of Mississippi upon the written request of the commission to do so, and shall be brought in the chancery court of the county or the chancery court of the judicial district of the county to which the commission’s order making such assessment is appealable under the provisions of Section 63-17-99. All civil penalties assessed and collected by the commission under the authority of this subsection shall be deposited in the general fund of the state treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 8071.7-06; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 6; Laws, 1977, ch. 411, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-87.
Limited revocation or suspension of license.

The revocation or suspension of the license of a manufacturer, factory branch or division, distributor, distributor branch or division, wholesaler, or wholesaler branch or division may be limited to:

One or more municipalities or counties.

The sales area of any dealer whose franchise is unfairly cancelled or terminated within the purview of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law, or whose franchise is not renewed in violation of the provisions of said law. However, where such a franchise is unfairly cancelled or terminated within the purview of said law or is not renewed in violation of the provisions of said law in a metropolitan area serviced by several motor vehicle dealers handling the same motor vehicles, the revocation or suspension shall not be applicable to the remaining motor vehicle dealers in such metropolitan area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-06; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-89.
Hearings; prerequisite to denial, revocation or suspension of license.

The commission shall not:

1. Deny an application for a license without first giving the applicant a hearing, or an opportunity to be heard, on the question of whether he is qualified under the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law to receive the license applied for.

2. Revoke or suspend a license without first giving the licensee a hearing, or an opportunity to be heard, on the question of whether there are sufficient grounds under the provisions of said law upon which to base such revocation or suspension.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-07; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-91.
Hearings; calling of hearing.

Any interested party shall have the right to have the commission call a hearing for the purpose of taking action in respect to any matter within the commission’s jurisdiction by filing with the commission a verified complaint setting forth the grounds upon which the complaint is based.

The commission may on its own motion call a hearing for the purpose of taking action in respect to any matter within its jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-07; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-93.
Hearings; notice; location; effect of failure to appear.

When a hearing is to be held before the commission, the commission shall give written notice thereof to all parties whose rights may be affected thereby. The notice shall set forth the reason for the hearing and the questions or issues to be decided by the commission at such hearing and the time when and the place where the hearing will be held. All such notices shall be mailed to all parties whose rights may be affected by such hearing by registered or certified mail, and addressed to their last known address. Any such hearing shall be held in the county where the principal office of the commission is located.

If any party who is notified of a hearing in accordance with the requirements of this section fails to appear at such hearing, either in person or by counsel, then and in that event the commission may make any decision and take any action it may deem necessary or appropriate with respect to any issue or question scheduled for hearing and decision by it at such hearing which affects or may affect the rights of such defaulting party.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-07; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 22; Laws, 1994, ch. 399, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 63-17-95.
Hearings; conduct; decisions.

All parties whose rights may be affected at any hearing before the commission shall have the right to appear personally and by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses appearing against them, and to produce evidence and witnesses in their own behalf. The commission shall make and keep a record of each such hearing and shall provide a transcript thereof to any interested party upon his request and at his expense. Testimony taken at all such hearings shall be taken either stenographically or by machine.

Witnesses who testify at any hearing before the commission shall testify under oath. The form of the oath or affirmation shall be in the form or to the effect following: “You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that the evidence you shall give as a witness at this hearing shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth; so help you God.”

Any member of the commission may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses testifying before the commission.

The commission shall prescribe its rules of order or procedure in hearings or other proceedings before it. However, such rules of order or procedure shall not be in conflict or contrary to the provisions of law governing hearings before the commission, and appeals therefrom.

All decisions of the commission with respect to the hearings shall be incorporated into orders of the commission and spread upon its minutes.

The commission may apply to the chancery court of the county or to the chancery court of the judicial district of the county, or to any chancellor of any such court in vacation, to which its order is appealable under the provisions of Section 63-17-99 for the enforcement of such order by injunction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-07, Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 7; Laws, 1977, ch. 411, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-97.
Execution and enforcement of summons, citation or subpoena.

It shall be the duty of the sheriffs and constables of the counties of this state and of any employee of the commission, when so directed by the commission, to execute any summons, citation or subpoena which the commission may cause to be issued and to make return thereof to the commission. The sheriffs and constables so serving and returning same shall be paid for so doing the fees provided for such services in the circuit court. Any person who appears before the commission or a duly designated employee thereof in response to a summons, citation or subpoena shall be paid the same witness fee and mileage allowance as witnesses in the circuit court.

In case of failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with any summons, citation or subpoena issued and served as above authorized or in the case of the refusal of any person to be sworn or affirmed as a witness, or testify or answer to any matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated as a witness, or the refusal of any person to produce his record books and accounts relating to any matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated as a witness, the chancery court of any county of the State of Mississippi, or any chancellor of any such court in vacation, may, on application of the commission or of the executive director thereof, issue an attachment for such person and compel him to comply with such summons, citation or subpoena and to attend before the commission or its designated employee and to produce the documents specified in any subpoena duces tecum and to be sworn or affirmed as a witness or to give his testimony upon such matters as he may be lawfully required. Any such chancery court, or any chancellor of any such court in vacation, shall have the power to punish for contempt as in case of disobedience of like process issued from or by any such chancery court, or as in case of refusal to be sworn or affirmed as a witness, or as in case of refusal to testify as a witness therein in response to such process, and such person shall be taxed with the costs of such proceedings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-07; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 7; Laws, 1977, ch. 411, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-99.
Appeals from decisions of commission; finality of decisions.

The following procedure shall govern in taking and perfecting appeals:

1. Any person who is a party to any hearing before the commission and who is aggrieved by any decision of the commission with respect to any hearing before it shall have the right of appeal to the chancery court of the county of such person’s residence or principal place of business within this state; if such person is a nonresident of the state he shall have the right of appeal to the chancery court of the residence of the opposing party, and if the opposing party is also a nonresident, the appeal shall be to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. All such appeals shall be taken and perfected within sixty days from the date of the decision of the commission which is the subject of the appeal. The chancery court to which such appeal is taken may affirm such decision or reverse and remand the same to the commission for further proceedings as justice may require or dismiss such decision. All such appeals shall be taken and perfected, heard and determined, either in term time or in vacation, on the record, including a transcript of pleadings and evidence, both oral and documentary, heard and filed before the commission. In perfecting any such appeal, the provisions of law respecting notice to the reporter and allowance of bills of exceptions, now or hereafter in force, respecting appeals from the chancery court to the supreme court shall be applicable. The reporter shall transcribe his notes, taken stenographically or by machine, and file the record with the commission within thirty days after approval of the appeal bond, unless, on application of the reporter, or of the appellant, an additional fifteen days shall have been allowed by the commission to the reporter within which to transcribe his notes and file the transcript of the record with the commission.

2. Upon the filing with the commission of a petition of appeal to the proper chancery court, it shall be the duty of the commission, as promptly as possible, and in any event within sixty days after approval of the appeal bond, to file with the clerk of said Chancery Court to which the appeal is taken, a copy of the petition for appeal and of the decision appealed from, and the original and one copy of the transcript of the record of the proceedings and evidence before the commission. After the filing of said petition, the appeal shall be perfected by the filing of a bond in the penal sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00) with two sureties or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as surety, conditioned to pay the costs of such appeal, said bond to be approved by any member of the commission or by its executive secretary or by the clerk of the chancery court to which such appeal is taken.

3. No decision of the commission made as a result of a hearing shall become final with respect to any party affected and aggrieved by such decision until such party shall have exhausted or shall have had an opportunity to exhaust all of his remedies. However, any such decision may be made final if the commission finds that failure to do so would be detrimental to the public interest or public welfare; however, the finality of any such decision shall not prevent any party or parties affected and aggrieved thereby to appeal the same in accordance with the appellate procedure set forth in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-07; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-101.
Recovery of damages and attorney fees by licensee.

Any licensee suffering pecuniary loss because of any willful failure by any other licensee to comply with any provision of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law or with any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission under authority vested in it by said law may recover reasonable damages and attorney fees therefor in any court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-09; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 63-17-103.
Restrictions on right to advertise motor vehicle as new; enforcement of restriction.

Nothing in the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law shall be construed to prohibit the sale of a new motor vehicle by any person who is not required to be licensed under said law. However, only a motor vehicle dealer as defined in Section 63-17-55 shall have the right to advertise or represent, publicly or otherwise, that a motor vehicle is new in connection with its sale, exchange or other disposition. Any person who is not such a motor vehicle dealer and who advertises or represents that a motor vehicle is new in connection with its sale, exchange or other disposition shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished in the manner provided for by Section 63-17-105. However, nothing in this section shall apply to (a) any lease by a motor vehicle manufacturer operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) of three (3) or fewer motor vehicles at any one time and related vehicle maintenance, of any line of vehicle produced by the manufacturer or its subsidiaries, to any one (1) employee of the motor vehicle manufacturer on a direct basis, or any sale or other disposition of such motor vehicles by the motor vehicle manufacturer at the end of a lease through direct sales to employees of the manufacturer or through an open auction or auction limited to dealers of the manufacturer’s vehicle line or its subsidiaries’ vehicle lines; or (b) any sale or other disposition by such a motor vehicle manufacturer of motor vehicles for which the manufacturer obtained distinguishing number tags under Section 27-19-309(8).

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section may be enjoined from further violations of such provisions by writ of injunction issued out of a court of equity upon a bill filed in the name of the state by the Attorney General, or any district or county attorney whose duty requires him to prosecute criminal cases on behalf of the state, in the county where such violation occurred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-10; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 10; Laws, 1977, ch. 411, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 27; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 21; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.).

§ 63-17-105.
Penalties.

Every person committing a willful violation of any provision of subsection (1) of Section 63-17-73 or of Section 63-17-103 or subsection (3) of Section 63-17-73 is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8071.7-08; Laws, 1970, ch. 478, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1983, ch. 344, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 305, § 28; Laws, 1994, ch. 399, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 63-17-107.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 305 § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Laws, 1979, ch. 301, § 34; ch. 357, § 2; 1983, ch. 344, § 29]

§ 63-17-109.
Right of first refusal.

In the event of a proposed sale or transfer of a dealership and the franchise agreement for the dealership contains a right of first refusal in favor of the manufacturer or distributor, notwithstanding the terms of the franchise agreement, the manufacturer or distributor shall be permitted to exercise a right of first refusal to acquire the dealership only if all of the following requirements are met:

The manufacturer or distributor sends by certified mail, return receipt requested, or any other reliable means of communication, notice of its intent to exercise its right of first refusal within sixty (60) days of receipt of the executed contract for the proposed sale or transfer and completed application and related documents reasonably requested by the manufacturer or distributor. The manufacturer or distributor shall provide the application and notice of other requirements within fifteen (15) days of request. In no event shall the manufacturer or distributor exercise its right of first refusal more than one hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of the executed contract. The manufacturer or distributor and the applicant shall act in good faith to provide the required information in a timely and expeditious manner.

The exercise of the right of first refusal will result in the motor vehicle dealer receiving consideration, terms and conditions that are either the same as or greater than that for which such dealer has contracted for in connection with the proposed transaction.

The manufacturer’s or distributor’s right of first refusal shall not apply to a transaction involving one (1) of the following:

A designated family member or members, including the spouse, child or grandchild, spouse of a child or grandchild, brother, sister or parent of the dealer-operator, or one or more motor vehicle dealer owners;

A manager employed by the motor vehicle dealer in the dealership during the previous five (5) years that is otherwise qualified as a dealer-operator;

A partnership or corporation controlled by any of the family members of the dealer-operator;

A trust arrangement established or to be established for the purpose of allowing the new motor vehicle dealer to continue to qualify as such pursuant to the manufacturer’s or distributor’s standards, or provides for the succession of the franchise agreement to designated family members or qualified management in the event of the death or incapacity of the dealer-operator or its principal owner or owners.

The manufacturer or distributor shall pay the reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees which do not exceed the usual, customary and reasonable fees charged for similar work done for other clients, incurred by the proposed owner prior to the exercise of the right of first refusal in negotiating and implementing the contract for the proposed sale of the dealership. The expenses and attorneys’ fees shall be paid to the proposed new owner at the time of the closing of the sale at which the manufacturer or distributor exercises its right of first refusal.

No payment of expenses and attorneys’ fees shall be required if the person claiming reimbursement has not submitted or caused to be submitted an accounting of those expenses within thirty (30) days after the receipt of the manufacturer’s or distributor’s written request for the accounting. A manufacturer or distributor may request the accounting before exercising its right of first refusal.

If the selling dealer discloses the manufacturer’s right of first refusal to the proposed owner in writing, the motor vehicle dealer shall not have any liability to any person as a result of a manufacturer or distributor exercising its right of first refusal and the manufacturer or distributor shall assume the defense of the selling motor vehicle dealer for any claims by the proposed owner arising from the exercise of the right of first refusal.

If the manufacturer or distributor does not exercise its right of first refusal within the time period set forth in subsection (1) (a), the manufacturer or distributor shall act upon the proposed sale of the franchise promptly and in good faith but in no event more than one hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of the completed application and related documents reasonably requested by the manufacturer or distributor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 432, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 63-17-111.
Owner of dealership may appoint successor by written agreement; manufacturer or dealer must honor succession unless good cause shown; procedure for refusing to honor succession.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, any dealer-operator may appoint by will, or other written instrument, a designated successor to succeed in the ownership of the dealer-operator in the dealership upon the death or incapacity of the dealer-operator.

Unless good cause exists for the refusal to honor the succession on the part of the manufacturer or distributor, any designated successor of a deceased or incapacitated dealer-operator of a dealership may succeed to the ownership of the motor vehicle dealership under the existing franchise agreement if:

The designated successor gives the manufacturer or distributor written notice of his or her intention to succeed to the ownership of the motor vehicle dealership within sixty (60) days after the dealer-operator’s death or incapacity; and

The designated successor agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the sales and service agreement.

The manufacturer or distributor may request, and the designated successor shall provide promptly upon such request, personal and financial data reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored.

If the manufacturer or distributor believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession of a deceased or incapacitated dealer, the manufacturer or distributor may, not more than sixty (60) days following receipt of the notice of the designated successor’s intent to succeed and receipt of such personal and financial data, serve upon the designated successor notice of its refusal to honor the proposed succession and of its intent to terminate the existing franchise with the dealer-operator not earlier than six (6) months from the date such notice of refusal is served.

Such notice shall state the specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession.

If such notice is not timely served upon the designated successor, the franchise agreement shall continue in effect subject to termination only as otherwise provided by the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law.

In determining whether good cause for the refusal to honor the succession exists, the manufacturer or distributor has the burden of proving that the designated successor is not of good moral character or does not otherwise meet the manufacturer’s or distributor’s reasonable standards for a dealer-operator.

If a manufacturer or distributor refuses to honor the succession to the ownership interest of a deceased or incapacitated dealer-operator for good cause, the manufacturer or distributor shall allow the designated successor a reasonable period of time, which shall not be less than six (6) months, in which to consummate the sale of the dealership.

Changes in the ownership of a new motor home dealership shall be governed by the provisions of Sections 63-17-201 through 63-17-221.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 532, § 13, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.